Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,138
Remedies; cumulative.

The remedies provided in sections 85-9,133 to 85-9,139 shall be cumulative and in addition to any other remedies provided by law.

Laws 1991, LB 69, § 6.